Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1622
No local energy code; contractor, architect, engineer; duties.

Prior to the construction, renovation, or addition to any existing building after the dates specified in section 81-1614 the following requirements shall be met where a county, city, or village has not adopted a local energy code pursuant to section 81-1618:

(1) When no architect or engineer is retained, the prime contractor shall build or cause to be built, to the best of his or her knowledge, according to the Nebraska Energy Code; and

(2) When an architect or engineer is retained: (a) The architect or engineer shall place his or her state registration seal on all construction drawings which shall indicate that the design meets the Nebraska Energy Code and (b) the prime contractor responsible for the actual construction shall build or cause to be built in accordance with the construction documents prepared by the architect or engineer.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 46;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 21;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 11.